Virginia statutes. Title 10.1. Conservation.
Chapter 16. Virginia Recreational Facilities Authority Act.

§ 10.1-1600.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Authority”
means the Virginia Recreational Facilities Authority.

“Board”
means the board of directors of the Authority.

“Bonds”
means notes, bonds, certificates and other evidences of indebtedness or obligations of the Authority.

“Federal agency”
means the United States of America, the President of the United States of America, and any department, corporation, agency, or instrumentality created, designated, or established by the United States of America.

“Project”
means the construction, improvement, furnishing, maintenance, acquisition or operation of any facility that will further the purposes of the Authority, together with all property, rights, easements and interests which may be acquired by the Authority.

History.

1986, c. 360, § 10-158.2; 1988, c. 891.

§ 10.1-1601.
Authority created.

In order to (i) provide a high quality recreational attraction in the western part of the Commonwealth; (ii) expand the historical knowledge of adults and children; (iii) promote tourism and economic development in the Commonwealth; (iv) set aside and conserve scenic and natural areas along the Roanoke River and preserve open-space lands; and (v) enhance and expand research and educational programs, there is created a political subdivision of the Commonwealth to be known as “The Virginia Recreational Facilities Authority.” The Authority’s exercise of the powers conferred by this chapter shall be deemed to be the performance of an essential governmental function.

History.

1986, c. 360, § 10-158.3; 1988, c. 891.

§ 10.1-1602.
Board of directors.

The Authority shall be governed by a board of directors consisting of 19 members who shall be appointed as follows: two members of the Senate to be appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules; four members of the House of Delegates to be appointed by the Speaker of the House of Delegates in accordance with the principles of proportional representation contained in the Rules of the House of Delegates; and 13 nonlegislative citizen members to be appointed by the Governor, upon consideration of the recommendation of the River Foundation, if any, and subject to confirmation by the General Assembly. Nonlegislative citizen members of the Authority shall be citizens of the Commonwealth.

Legislative members shall serve terms coincident with their terms of office. After the initial staggering of terms, nonlegislative citizen members shall be appointed for a term of five years. Vacancies in the membership of the Board shall be filled for the unexpired portion of the term in the same manner as original appointments are made. All members may be reappointed.

Immediately after appointment, the directors shall enter upon the performance of their duties. The Board shall annually elect a chairman and vice-chairman from its members, and shall also elect annually a secretary, who may or may not be a member of the Board. The Board may also elect other subordinate officers who may or may not be members of the Board, as it deems proper. Seven directors shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of the business of the Authority, and no vacancy in the membership of the Board shall impair the right of a quorum to exercise all the rights and perform all the duties of the Authority. The Board may employ an executive director to direct the day-to-day activities of the Authority and carry out the powers and duties delegated to him. The executive director shall serve at the pleasure of the Board. The executive director and employees of the Authority shall be compensated in the manner provided by the Board and shall not be subject to the provisions of the Virginia Personnel Act (§ 2.2-2900 et seq.).

Legislative members of the Authority shall receive such compensation as provided in § 30-19.12, and nonlegislative citizen members shall receive such compensation for the performance of their duties as provided in § 2.2-2813. All members shall be reimbursed for all reasonable and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties as provided in §§ 2.2-2813 and 2.2-2825. Funding for the costs of compensation and expenses of the members shall be provided by the Virginia Recreational Facilities Authority.

History.

1986, c. 360, § 10-158.4; 1988, c. 891; 1989, c. 226; 1990, c. 210; 2005, c. 768; 2006, c. 22.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 768 rewrote the first and second paragraphs, substituted “Ten” for “Seven” at the beginning of the fourth sentence of the third paragraph and added the last paragraph.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 22 substituted “Seven” for “Ten” at the beginning of the fourth sentence of the third paragraph.

§ 10.1-1603.
Powers of Authority.

The Authority is granted all powers necessary or convenient for carrying out its statutory purposes, including the following rights and powers:

To acquire by gift, devise, purchase, or otherwise, absolutely or in trust, and to hold, use, lease as lessee and unless otherwise restricted by the terms of the gift or devise, to lease as lessor, convey, sell or otherwise dispose of any property, real or personal, or any estate or interest therein including water rights. However, the Authority shall have no power to encumber its real property or create any estate or interest therein other than encumbrances on structures not extending to the real property upon which such structures are constructed.

To make and enter into any contracts and agreements with any appropriate person or federal agency. Such contracts include but are not limited to (i) agreements with the Commonwealth, or any agency thereof, to lease property owned or controlled by the Commonwealth, for the purpose of construction, improvement, maintenance, or operation of any project or activity that will further the purposes described in this chapter; and (ii) agreements with any person to sublease property owned or controlled by the Commonwealth or to issue licenses for the purpose of construction, improvement, maintenance, or operation of any project or activity that will further the purposes described in this chapter.

To plan, develop, carry out, construct, improve, rehabilitate, repair, furnish, maintain, and operate projects.

To promulgate regulations concerning the use of properties under its control to protect such property and the public thereon.

To fix, alter, charge, and collect rates, rentals, and other charges for the use of projects of, or for the sale of products of or for the services rendered by the Authority. Such charges shall be used to pay the expenses of the Authority, the planning, development, construction, improvement, rehabilitation, repair, furnishing, maintenance, and operation of its projects and properties, the costs of accomplishing its purposes set forth in §

10.1-1601

, and the principal of and interest on its obligations, and to fulfill the terms and provisions of any agreements made with the purchasers or holders of any such obligations. Such fees, rents and charges shall not be subject to supervision or regulation by any commission, board, or agency of the Commonwealth or any political subdivision thereof.

To borrow money, make and issue bonds including bonds that the Authority may determine to issue for the purposes set forth in §

10.1-1601

or of refunding bonds previously issued by the Authority. The Authority shall have the right to secure the payment of all bonds, or any part thereof, by pledge or deed of trust of all or any of its revenues, rentals, and receipts or of any project or property, tangible or intangible, or any interest therein. However, the Authority shall have no power to encumber its real property or create any estate or interest therein other than encumbrances on structures not extending to the real property upon which such structures are located. The bonds may be secured by a pledge of any grant or contribution from a person or federal agency. The Authority shall have the power to make agreements with the purchasers or holders of the bonds or with others in connection with the bonds, whether issued or to be issued, as it deems advisable, and in general to provide for the security for the bonds and the rights of the bond holders.

To employ consultants, attorneys, architects, engineers, accountants, financial experts, investment bankers, superintendents, managers and such other employees and agents as may be necessary, and to fix their compensation to be payable from funds made available to the Authority.

To receive and accept from any federal agency, foundation, or person, grants, loans, gifts or contributions of money, property, or other things of value, to be held, used and applied only for the purposes for which the grant or contribution is made or to be expended in accomplishing the objectives of the Authority.

To develop, undertake and provide programs, alone or in conjunction with any person or federal agency, for scientific research, continuing education, and in-service training, provided that credit towards a degree, certificate or diploma shall be granted only if the education is provided in conjunction with an institution of higher education authorized to operate in the Commonwealth; and to foster the utilization of scientific research information, discoveries and data.

To pledge or otherwise encumber all or any of the revenues or receipts of the Authority as security for all or any of the obligations of the Authority.

To do all acts and things necessary or convenient to carry out the powers granted by this chapter or any other acts.

History.

1986, c. 360, § 10-158.5; 1988, c. 891; 1991, c. 706.

§ 10.1-1604.
Form, terms, and execution of bonds.

The bonds of each issue shall be dated, shall bear interest at rates fixed by the Authority, shall mature at a time not exceeding forty years from their date, as determined by the Authority, and may be made redeemable before maturity, at the option of the Authority, at a price and under terms and conditions fixed by the Authority prior to the issuance of the bonds. The Authority shall determine the form of bonds and manner of execution of the bonds and shall fix the denomination of the bonds and the place of payment of principal and interest, which may be at any bank or trust company.

The bonds shall be signed by the chairman or vice-chairman of the Authority, or if authorized by the Authority, shall bear his facsimile signature, and the official seal of the Authority, or, if authorized by the Authority, a facsimile signature thereof shall be impressed or imprinted thereon and attested by the secretary or any assistant secretary of the Authority, or, if authorized by the Authority, with the facsimile signature of such secretary or assistant secretary. Any coupons attached to bonds issued by the Authority shall bear the signature or facsimile signature of the chairman or vice-chairman of the Authority. If any officer whose signature or facsimile signature appears on any bonds or coupons ceases to be an officer before the delivery of the bonds, the signature or facsimile shall nevertheless be valid for all purposes. Any bonds may bear the facsimile signature of, or may be signed by, persons who are the proper officers to sign the bonds at the actual time of the execution of such bonds although at the date of the bonds such persons may not have been officers.

History.

1986, c. 360, § 10-158.6; 1988, c. 891.

§ 10.1-1605.
Issuance and sale of bonds.

The bonds may be issued in coupon or in registered form, or both, as the Authority may determine, and provision may be made for the registration of any coupon bonds as to principal alone and also as to both principal and interest, for the reconversion into coupon bonds of any bonds registered as to both principal and interest, and for the interchange of registered and coupon bonds. The Authority may sell such bonds in the manner, either at public or private sale, and for the price, that it determines will best effect the purposes of this chapter. Bonds may be issued under the provisions of this chapter without obtaining the consent of any commission, board or agency of the Commonwealth or of any political subdivision, and without any other proceedings or conditions other than those which are specifically required by this chapter.

History.

1986, c. 360, § 10-158.6; 1988, c. 891.

§ 10.1-1606.
Use of bond proceeds.

The proceeds of the bonds of each issue shall be used solely for the purposes of the Authority provided in the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds or in the trust agreement authorized in this chapter.

History.

1986, c. 360, § 10-158.6; 1988, c. 891.

§ 10.1-1607.
Interim receipts or temporary bonds.

The Authority is authorized to issue interim receipts or temporary bonds as provided in §

15.2-2616

and to execute and deliver new bonds in place of bonds mutilated, lost or destroyed, as provided in §

15.2-2621

.

History.

1986, c. 360, § 10-158.6; 1988, c. 891.

§ 10.1-1608.
Faith and credit of Commonwealth or political subdivision not pledged.

No obligation of the Authority shall constitute a debt, or pledge of the faith and credit, of the Commonwealth or of any political subdivision, but shall be payable solely from the revenue and other funds of the Authority which have been pledged. All such obligations shall contain on the face a statement to the effect that the Commonwealth, political subdivisions, and the Authority shall not be obligated to pay the obligation or the interest except from revenues and other funds of the Authority which have been pledged, and that neither the faith and credit nor the taxing power of the Commonwealth or of any political subdivision is pledged to the payment of the principal of or the interest on such obligations.

History.

1986, c. 360, § 10-158.6; 1988, c. 891.

§ 10.1-1609.
Expenses of the Authority.

All expenses incurred in carrying out the provisions of this chapter shall be payable solely from funds provided under the provisions of this chapter and no liability shall be incurred by the Authority beyond the extent to which moneys are provided under the provisions of this chapter.

History.

1986, c. 306, § 10-158.6; 1988, c. 891.

§ 10.1-1610.
Trust agreement securing bonds.

In the discretion of the Authority any bonds issued under the provisions of this chapter may be secured by a trust agreement between the Authority and a corporate trustee, which may be any trust company or bank having the powers of a trust company.
The trust agreement or the resolution providing for the issuance of bonds may pledge or assign the revenues to be received and provide for the mortgage of any project or property or any part thereof.
However, the Authority shall have no power to encumber its real property or create any estate or interest therein other than encumbrances on structures not extending to the real property upon which such structures are located.
The trust agreement or resolution may contain reasonable, proper and lawful provisions for protecting and enforcing the rights and remedies of the bondholders. The trust agreement or resolution may include covenants setting forth the duties of the Authority in relation to the acquisition of property and the planning, development, acquisition, construction, rehabilitation, establishment, improvement, extension, enlargement, maintenance, repair, operation and insurance of the project in connection with which such bonds have been authorized, the rates and fees to be charged, the custody, safeguarding and application of all moneys, and conditions or limitations with respect to the issuance of additional bonds.
It shall be lawful for any bank or trust company incorporated under the laws of the Commonwealth which may act as depository of the proceeds of bonds or of revenue, to furnish such indemnifying bonds or to pledge such securities as may be required by the Authority. The trust agreement may set forth the rights of action by bondholders and other provisions the Authority deems reasonable and proper for the security of the bondholders. All expenses incurred in carrying out the provisions of the trust agreement or resolution may be treated as a part of the operation of the project.

History.

1986, c. 360, § 10-158.7; 1988, c. 891; 1991, c. 706.

§ 10.1-1611.
Moneys received deemed trust funds.

All moneys received pursuant to the authority of this chapter, whether as proceeds from the sale of bonds or as revenues, shall be deemed to be trust funds to be held and applied solely as provided in this chapter. The resolution authorizing the bonds of any issue or the trust agreement securing such bonds shall provide that any officer with whom, or any bank or trust company with which, such moneys are deposited shall act as a trustee of such moneys and shall hold and apply the moneys for the purposes hereof, subject to such regulations as this chapter and the resolution or trust agreement may provide.

History.

1986, c. 360, § 10-158.8; 1988, c. 891.

§ 10.1-1612.
Proceedings by bondholder or trustee to enforce rights.

Any holder of bonds issued under the provisions of this chapter or any of the applicable coupons, and the trustee under any trust agreement, except to the extent the rights herein given may be restricted by the trust agreement or the resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds, may protect and enforce rights under the laws of the Commonwealth or under the trust agreement or resolution, and may enforce all duties required by this chapter or by the trust agreement or resolution to be performed by the Authority or by any officer thereof, including the fixing, charging, and collecting of rates, rentals, and other charges.

History.

1986, c. 360, § 10-158.9; 1988, c. 891.

§ 10.1-1613.
Bonds made securities for investment and deposit.

Bonds issued by the Authority under the provisions of this chapter are hereby made securities in which all public officers and public bodies of the Commonwealth and its political subdivisions, all insurance companies, trust companies, banking associations, investment companies, executors, administrators, trustees, and other fiduciaries may properly and legally invest funds, including capital in their control or belonging to them. Such bonds are hereby made securities which may properly and legally be deposited with and received by any state or municipal officer or any agency or political subdivision of the Commonwealth for any purpose authorized by law.

History.

1986, c. 360, § 10-158.10; 1988, c. 891.

§ 10.1-1614.
Revenue refunding bonds; bonds for refunding and for cost of additional projects.

The Authority is authorized to provide for the issuance of revenue refunding bonds of the Authority for the purpose of refunding any bonds then outstanding which have been issued under the provisions of this chapter, including the payment of any redemption premium and any interest accrued or to accrue to the date of redemption of such bonds, and, if deemed advisable by the Authority, for the additional purpose of constructing improvements, extensions, or enlargements of the projects in connection with which the bonds to be refunded have been issued. The Authority is further authorized to provide by resolution for the issuance of its revenue bonds for the combined purpose of (i) refunding any bonds then outstanding which have been issued under the provisions of this chapter, including the payment of any redemption premium and any interest accrued or to accrue to the date of redemption of such bonds, and (ii) paying all or any part of the cost of any additional project or any portion thereof. The issuance of such bonds, the maturities and other details, the rights of the holders, and the rights, duties and obligations of the Authority shall be governed by the provisions of this chapter.

History.

1986, c. 360, § 10-158.11; 1988, c. 891.

§ 10.1-1615.
Grants or loans of public or private funds.

The Authority is authorized to accept, receive, receipt for, disburse, and expend federal and state moneys and other moneys, public or private, made available by grant, loan or otherwise, to accomplish any of the purposes of this chapter. All federal moneys accepted under this section shall be accepted and expended by the Authority upon terms and conditions prescribed by the United States and consistent with state law. All state moneys accepted under this section shall be accepted and expended by the Authority upon terms and conditions prescribed by the Commonwealth.

History.

1986, c. 360, § 10-158.12; 1988, c. 891.

§ 10.1-1616.
Exemption from taxes or assessments.

The exercise of the powers granted by this chapter is for the benefit of the people of the Commonwealth, for the increase of their commerce and prosperity, and for the improvement of their health and living conditions. Since the operation and maintenance of projects by the Authority and the undertaking of activities in furtherance of the purpose of the Authority will constitute the performance of essential governmental functions, the Authority shall not be required to pay any taxes or assessments upon any project or any property acquired or used by the Authority under the provisions of this chapter or upon the income therefrom, including sales and use taxes on tangible personal property used in the operations of the Authority. Any bonds issued under the provisions of this chapter, their transfer and the income which may result, including any profit made on the sale, shall be free from state and local taxation. The exemption hereby granted shall not be construed to extend to persons conducting business on the premises of a facility for which local or state taxes would otherwise be required.

History.

1986, c. 360, § 10-158.13; 1988, c. 891.

§ 10.1-1617.
Moneys of Authority.

All moneys of the Authority, from whatever source derived, shall be paid to the treasurer of the Authority. Such moneys shall be deposited by the treasurer in one or more banks or trust companies, in one or more special accounts. All banks and trust companies are authorized to give security for such deposits, if required by the Authority. The moneys in the accounts shall be paid out on the warrant or other order of the treasurer of the Authority or any person authorized by the Authority to execute such warrants or orders. The Auditor of Public Accounts of the Commonwealth, and his legally authorized representatives, shall examine the accounts and books of the Authority.

History.

1986, c. 360, § 10-158.15; 1988, c. 891.

§ 10.1-1618.
Title to property.

The Authority may acquire title to property in its own name or in the name of the Commonwealth for and on behalf of the Authority.
In the event the Authority ceases to operate its projects and to promote the purposes stated in §

10.1-1601

or is dissolved, the title to real property held by the Authority shall transfer to the Commonwealth and be administered by the Department of Conservation and Recreation; provided however, in the event that an environmental audit of any real property or interest therein, or portion of such property, to be transferred pursuant to this section discloses any environmental liability or violation of law or regulation, present or contingent, the Governor may reject the transfer of any portion of such property which he determines to be environmentally defective.

History.

1986, c. 360, § 10-158.16; 1988, c. 891; 1991, c. 706.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2008, c. 655, cl. 1, effective March 27, 2008, as amended by Acts 2009, c. 739, cl. 1, and Acts 2010, cc. 279 and 731, cl. 1, provides: “That the provisions in §

10.1-1618

of the Code of Virginia requiring a reversion of title to real property from the Virginia Recreational Facilities Authority to the Commonwealth, in the event that the Authority ceases to operate a project, shall not be enforceable until July 1, 2011.”

Acts 2010, cc. 279 and 731, cl. 2 provides: “That the Virginia Recreational Facilities Authority and Roanoke County shall work with other stakeholders to develop an alternate plan for the appropriate utilization and management of the property. The plan shall be consistent with the mission of the Explore Park and shall include conservation, outdoor recreation, environmental awareness, and public access and utilization of the property. The plan shall also provide ways for the park to become financially independent. The plan shall be completed and transmitted to the Governor and the General Assembly by December 31, 2010.”

§ 10.1-1619.
Violation of regulations.

Violation of any regulation adopted pursuant to §

10.1-1603

which would have been a violation of law or ordinance if committed on a public street or highway shall be tried and punished as if it had been committed on a public street or highway. Any other violation of such regulations shall be punishable as a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

1986, c. 360, § 10-158.17; 1988, c. 891.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

§ 10.1-1620.
Appointment of special conservators of the peace.

The chairman of the Authority or his designee may apply to the circuit court of any county or city for the appointment of one or more special conservators of the peace under procedures specified by §

19.2-13

.

History.

1986, c. 360, § 10-158.18; 1988, c. 891.

§ 10.1-1621.
Conveyance or lease of park to Authority.

The Commonwealth or any county, municipality, or other public body is authorized to convey or lease to the Authority, with or without consideration, any property to use for projects that will further the purposes described in this chapter.

History.

1986, c. 360, § 10-158.19; 1988, c. 891.

§ 10.1-1622.
Recordation of conveyances of real estate to Authority.

No deed purporting to convey real estate to the Authority shall be recorded unless accepted by a person authorized to act on behalf of the Authority, which acceptance shall appear on the face of the deed.

History.

1986, c. 360, § 10-158.20; 1988, c. 891.